ru: Уровень жесткости поддержки: Регулируемый; Только амортизация; Высокие; Низкие; Средний; Жесткая поддержка; Полужесткая поддержка; Другой
sk-SK: Úroveň pevnosti podpory: Nastaviteľný; Iba tlmenie; Vysoký; Nízky; Stredný; Pevná podpora; Polopevná podpora; Iné
zh-TW: 支撐剛性等級: 可調節式; 僅緩衝; 高; 低; 中等; 硬性支撐; 半硬性支撐; 其他
en: Support rigidity level: Adjustable; Cushioning only; High; Low; Medium; Rigid support; Semi-rigid support; Other
es: Nivel de rigidez del soporte: Ajustable; Solo amortiguación; Alto; Bajo; Medio; Soporte rígido; Soporte semirrígido; Otros
de: Unterstützungs-Steifigkeitsgrad: Einstellbar; Nur Polsterung; Hoch; Niedrig; Mittel; Starre Unterstützung; Halbstarre Unterstützung; Sonstiges
nb: Støttestivhetsnivå: Regulerbar; Kun demping; Høy; Lav; Middels; Stiv støtte; Halvstiv støtte; Annet
pt-PT: Nível de rigidez do suporte: Ajustável; Apenas amortecimento; Alto; Baixo; Moagem média; Suporte rígido; Suporte semirrígido; Outro
it: Livello di rigidità del supporto: Regolabile; Solo ammortizzazione; Alto; Basso; Medio; Supporto rigido; Supporto semi-rigido; Altro
vi: Mức độ cứng hỗ trợ: Có thể điều chỉnh; Chỉ đệm; Cao; Trễ; Vừa; Hỗ trợ cứng; Hỗ trợ bán cứng; Khác
th: ระดับความแข็งของการรองรับ: แบบปรับได้; รองรับเท่านั้น; เอวสูง; ต่ำ; ปานกลาง; พยุงแข็ง; พยุงกึ่งแข็ง; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Nível de rigidez do suporte: Ajustável; Apenas amortecimento; Alta; Baixa; Médio; Suporte rígido; Suporte semirrígido; Outro
ro-RO: Nivelul de rigiditate al suportului: Ajustabil; Doar amortizare; Înaltă; Joasă; Medie; Suport rigid; Suport semi-rigid; Altele
cs: Úroveň tuhosti podpory: Nastavitelný; Pouze polstrování; Vysoký; Nízký; Střední; Pevná podpora; Polopevná podpora; Jiné
bg-BG: Ниво на твърдост на опората: Регулируемо; Само омекотяване; Висок; Нисък; Средна; Твърда опора; Полутвърда опора; Други
fr: Niveau de rigidité du soutien: Ajustables; Coussin uniquement; Haute; Basse; Moyen; Support rigide; Support semi-rigide; Autre
hu: Támasztás merevségi szintje: Állítható; Csak párnázás; Magas; Alacsony; Közepes; Merev támasz; Félmerev támasz; Egyéb
tr: Destek sertlik seviyesi: Ayarlanabilir; Sadece yastıklama; Yüksek; Düşük; Orta; Sert destek; Yarı sert destek; Diğer
fi: Tuen jäykkyystaso: Säädettävä; Vain pehmuste; Korkea; Matala; Keskimääräinen; Jäykkä tuki; Puolijäykkä tuki; Muu
da: Støttestivhedsniveau: Justerbar; Kun polstring; Høj; Lav; Medium; Stiv støtte; Semi-stiv støtte; Andet
ko: 지지 강성 수준: 조절식; 쿠셔닝만; 높음; 낮음; 중간; 강성 지지대; 반강성 지지대; 기타
lt-LT: Atramos standumo lygis: Reguliuojamas; Tik švelnumas; Aukštas; Žemas; Vidutinis; Standus palaikymas; Pusiau standus palaikymas; Kita
zh-CN: 支撑硬度等级: 可调节; 仅缓冲; 高; 低; 中度; 刚性支撑; 半刚性支撑; 其他
nl: Ondersteuning stijfheidsniveau: Verstelbaar; Alleen demping; Hoog; Laag; Medium; Starre ondersteuning; Semi-starre ondersteuning; Andere
hr-HR: Razina krutosti potpore: Podesivo; Samo ublažavanje; Visoki; Niski; Polusuho; Kruta potpora; Polukruta potpora; Ostalo
sl-SI: Stopnja togosti podpore: Prilagodljiva; Samo blazinjenje; Visoka; Nizek; Medij; Toga podpora; Poltoga podpora; Drugo
ja: サポート剛性レベル: 調整可能; クッションのみ; 高; 低; 中挽き; 硬性サポート; 半硬性サポート; その他
el: Επίπεδο ακαμψίας υποστήριξης: Ρυθμιζόμενο; Μόνο μαξιλάρισμα; Υψηλή; Χαμηλή; Μέση; Άκαμπτη στήριξη; Ημι-άκαμπτη στήριξη; Άλλο
sv: Stödstyvhetsnivå: Justerbar; Endast dämpning; Hög; Låg; Medium; Styvt stöd; Halvstyvt stöd; Övrigt
pl: Poziom sztywności podpory: Regulowane; Tylko amortyzacja; Wysoki; Niski; Średni; Sztywne wsparcie; Półsztywne wsparcie; Inne